District of Columbia statutes.
31-2708

Additional powers and duties of Commissioner.

(a)

In addition to any powers hereinbefore expressly enumerated in this chapter, the Commissioner shall have full power and authority, and it shall be his duty, to enforce by regulations made and promulgated by the Council of the District of Columbia, by orders, or otherwise all and singular, the provisions of this chapter, and the full intent thereof. In particular he shall have the authority and power:

(1)

To examine all records of companies and rating organizations and to require any or every company, agent, broker, and rating organization to furnish under oath such information as he may deem necessary for the administration of this chapter. The expense of such examination shall be paid by the company or rating organization examined. In lieu of such examination the Commissioner may, in his discretion, accept a report of examination made by any other insurance supervisory authority;

(2)

The Council of the District of Columbia shall have the authority and power to make, and the Commissioner shall have the authority and power to enforce, such reasonable orders, rules, and regulations as may be necessary in making this chapter effective, but such orders, rules, and regulations shall not be contrary to or inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter;

(3)

To issue an order, after a full hearing to all parties in interest, requiring any group, association, or organization of companies and the members thereof to cease and desist from any unfair or unreasonable practice.

(b)

The Commissioner may designate 1 or more rating organizations or other agencies to assist him in gathering statistical data and in making such compilations thereof as may be necessary for the proper administration of this chapter. Such compilations shall be made available, subject to reasonable rules promulgated by the Council of the District of Columbia, to companies and rating organizations.

(c)

The Commissioner shall have no authority at any hearing to compel the attendance of witnesses and he shall not be required to adhere to formal rules of pleading or evidence. At the request of a party or parties in interest made prior to any hearing, he shall administer oaths to witnesses and shall permit such party or parties, at the cost and expense of one who so requests, to have made a record of the hearing, which record upon request of such party or parties the Commissioner shall certify.

May 20, 1948, 62 Stat. 246, ch. 324, § 8
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(t), 44 DCR 1730
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(279) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2701.
1973 Ed., § 35-1508.
1981 Ed., § 35-1708.